Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.060

Credits for educational staff associates to fulfill continuing education requirements.

The Washington professional educator standards board rules for continuing education shall provide that educational staff associates may use credits or clock hours that satisfy the continuing education requirements for their state professional licensure, if any, to fulfill the continuing education requirements established by the Washington professional educator standards board.

[ 2005 c 497 s 210; 1991 c 155 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.